csv2yaml/yaml_output/VAI_Cnj_VV.yaml
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Incl+NA: nibaayang
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+X+NA: nibaang
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+1Sg+NA: webinigeyaan
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Pl+NA: webinigeyeg
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Sg+NA: webinigeyan
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlObv+NA: webinigenid
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+NA: webinigewaad
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgObv+NA: webinigenid
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+NA: webiniged
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Excl+NA: webinigeyaang
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Incl+NA: webinigeyang
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+X+NA: webinigeng
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+1Sg+NA: madaabiiyaan
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Pl+NA: madaabiiyeg
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Sg+NA: madaabiiyan
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlObv+NA: madaabiinid
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+NA: madaabiiwaad
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgObv+NA: madaabiinid
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+NA: madaabiid
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Excl+NA: madaabiiyaang
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Incl+NA: madaabiiyang
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+X+NA: madaabiing
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+1Sg+NA: maajiibatooyaan
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Pl+NA: maajiibatooyeg
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Sg+NA: maajiibatooyan
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlObv+NA: maajiibatoonid
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+NA: maajiibatoowaad
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgObv+NA: maajiibatoonid
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+NA: maajiibatood
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Excl+NA: maajiibatooyaang
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Incl+NA: maajiibatooyang
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+X+NA: maajiibatoong
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+1Sg+NA: nibaasiwaambaan
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Pl+NA: nibaasiwegiban
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Sg+NA: nibaasiwamban
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3PlObv+NA: nibaasinigoban
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+NA: nibaasigwaaban
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgObv+NA: nibaasinigoban
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+NA: nibaasigoban
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Excl+NA: nibaasiwaangiban
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Incl+NA: nibaasiwangiban
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+X+NA: nibaasingiban
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+1Sg+NA: webinigesiwaambaan
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Pl+NA: webinigesiwegiban
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Sg+NA: webinigesiwamban
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3PlObv+NA: webinigesinigoban
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+NA: webinigesigwaaban
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgObv+NA: webinigesinigoban
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+NA: webinigesigoban
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Excl+NA: webinigesiwaangiban
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Incl+NA: webinigesiwangiban
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+X+NA: webinigesingiban
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+1Sg+NA: madaabiisiwaambaan
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Pl+NA: madaabiisiwegiban
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Sg+NA: madaabiisiwamban
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3PlObv+NA: madaabiisinigoban
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+NA: madaabiisigwaaban
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgObv+NA: madaabiisinigoban
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+NA: madaabiisigoban
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Excl+NA: madaabiisiwaangiban
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Incl+NA: madaabiisiwangiban
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+X+NA: madaabiisingiban
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+1Sg+NA: maajiibatoosiwaambaan
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Pl+NA: maajiibatoosiwegiban
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Sg+NA: maajiibatoosiwamban
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3PlObv+NA: maajiibatoosinigoban
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+NA: maajiibatoosigwaaban
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgObv+NA: maajiibatoosinigoban
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+NA: maajiibatoosigoban
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Excl+NA: maajiibatoosiwaangiban
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Incl+NA: maajiibatoosiwangiban
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+X+NA: maajiibatoosingiban
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+1Sg+NA: nibaayaambaan
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Pl+NA: nibaayegiban
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Sg+NA: nibaayamban
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlObv+NA: nibaanipan
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+NA: nibaawaapan
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgObv+NA: nibaanipan
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+NA: nibaapan
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Excl+NA: nibaayaangiban
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Incl+NA: nibaayangiban
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+X+NA: nibaangiban
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+1Sg+NA: webinigeyaambaan
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Pl+NA: webinigeyegiban
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Sg+NA: webinigeyamban
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlObv+NA: webinigenipan
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+NA: webinigewaapan
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgObv+NA: webinigenipan
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+NA: webinigepan
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Excl+NA: webinigeyaangiban
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Incl+NA: webinigeyangiban
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+X+NA: webinigengiban
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+1Sg+NA: madaabiiyaambaan
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Pl+NA: madaabiiyegiban
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Sg+NA: madaabiiyamban
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlObv+NA: madaabiinipan
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+NA: madaabiiwaapan
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgObv+NA: madaabiinipan
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+NA: madaabiipan
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Excl+NA: madaabiiyaangiban
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Incl+NA: madaabiiyangiban
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+X+NA: madaabiingiban
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+1Sg+NA: maajiibatooyaambaan
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Pl+NA: maajiibatooyegiban
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Sg+NA: maajiibatooyamban
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlObv+NA: maajiibatoonipan
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+NA: maajiibatoowaapan
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgObv+NA: maajiibatoonipan
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+NA: maajiibatoopan
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Excl+NA: maajiibatooyaangiban
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Incl+NA: maajiibatooyangiban
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+X+NA: maajiibatoongiban
